Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 12. JUVENILE JUSTICE SERVICES AND FACILITIES

SUBTITLE C. SECURE FACILITIES

CHAPTER 246. INDUSTRIES PROGRAM

Sec. 246.001. PURPOSE; IMPLEMENTATION. The purposes of the department industries program are:

(1) to provide adequate employment and vocational training for children; and

(2) to develop and expand public and private department industries.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.003. PAY AND DISTRIBUTION OF PAY. The department shall apportion wages earned by a child working under the industries program in amounts determined at the discretion of the department, in the following priority:

(1) a person to whom the child has been ordered by a court or to whom the child has agreed to pay restitution;

(2) a person to whom the child has been ordered by a court to pay child support;

(3) the compensation to victims of crime fund or the compensation to victims of crime auxiliary fund; and

(4) the child's student account.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.004. INDUSTRIES FUND. (a) A Texas Juvenile Justice Department industries program fund is created in the state treasury.

(b) Proceeds from the operation of the industries program shall be deposited in the fund.

(c) Money from the fund may be appropriated only for use by the department for the administration of this chapter.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.005. CONTRACTS. To encourage the development and expansion of the industries program, the department may enter into necessary contracts related to the program.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.006. DONATIONS. The industries program may be financed through contributions donated for this purpose by private businesses contracting with the department.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.007. GRANTS. (a) The department may accept a grant for the vocational rehabilitation of children.

(b) The department shall maintain a record of the receipt and disbursement of a grant and shall annually report to the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives on the administration of grant funds.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.008. LEASE OF LAND. (a) The department may lease land owned by the department to a private business to expand and develop the industries program.

(b) The term of the lease may not exceed 20 years.

(c) The business must lease the land at fair market value.

(d) The business may construct a new facility on the land or convert an existing facility.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 246.009. OPTIONAL AD VALOREM TAX ABATEMENT. (a) A business contracting with the department may enter into an ad valorem tax abatement agreement under Subchapters B and C, Chapter 312, Tax Code, with the governing body of the municipality and county in which the business is located.

(b) If an area in which businesses contracting with the department under this subchapter is designated as a reinvestment zone under Chapter 312, Tax Code, the area satisfies Section 312.202(a)(6), Tax Code, in that the area would be reasonably likely as a result of the designation to contribute to the retention or expansion of primary employment or to attract major investment in the zone that would be a benefit to the property and that would contribute to the economic development of the entity designating the area as a reinvestment zone.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Human Resources Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 61 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2011.